src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
а (->) А, б (->) Б, в (->) В, г (->) Г, д (->) Д, е (->) Е, ё (->) Ё, 
ж (->) Ж, ӟ (->) Ӝ, з (->) З, ӟ (->) Ӟ, и (->) И, ӥ (->) Ӥ, й (->) Й,
к (->) К, л (->) Л, м (->) М, н (->) Н, о (->) О, ӧ (->) Ӧ, п (->) П,
р (->) Р, с (->) С, т (->) Т, у (->) У, ф (->) Ф, х (->) Х, ц (->) Ц,
ч (->) Ч, ш (->) Ш, щ (->) Щ, ъ (->) Ъ, ы (->) Ы, ь (->) Ь, э (->) Э,
ю (->) Ю, я (->) Я || .#. _ ;
